Hawaii statutes.
[§205A-63] Agency duties to
coordinate related programs. All agencies managing marine and coastal
resources, shall:

(1) Actively work toward the goals, objectives, and
policies established by this chapter; and

(2) Coordinate the development of the state or county
agency's programs with the plan. [L 1995, c 104, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next